fr: Articulation des membres: Fixe; Entièrement articulé; Aucun; Semi-flexible; Autre
en: Limb articulation: Fixed; Fully articulated; None; Semi-flexible; Other
sl-SI: Gibljivost udov: Fiksno; Popolnoma gibljivo; Brez; Polgibljivo; Drugo
fi: Raajan liikkuminen: Kiinteä; Täysin nivelletty; Ei mitään; Puolijoustava; Muu
es: Articulación de las extremidades: Fijo; Totalmente articulado; Ninguno; Semiflexible; Otro
pl: Staw kończyn: Nieruchome; W pełni ruchome; Brak; Półelastyczne; Inne
zh-TW: 肢體關節活動度: 固定; 全關節可動; 無; 半彈性; 其他
el: Άρθρωση άκρων: Σταθερά; Πλήρως αρθρωτά; Καμία; Ημι-εύκαμπτα; Άλλο
tr: Uzuv eklem hareketliliği: Sabit; Tamamen hareketli; Yok; Yarı esnek; Diğer
ro-RO: Articulația membrelor: Fix; Complet articulat; Fără; Semiflexibil; Altele
hu: Végtagok artikulációja: Fix; Teljesen mozgatható; Nincs; Félig rugalmas; Egyéb
ru: Подвижность конечностей: Фиксированная; Полностью шарнирная; Нет; Полугибкая; Другое
nb: Lemmets artikulasjon: Fast; Fullt leddet; Ingen; Semifleksibel; Annet
pt-BR: Membro articulação: Fixo; Totalmente articulado; Nenhum; Semiflexível; Outro
th: ข้อต่อแขนขา: คงที่; ขยับข้อต่อได้ทุกส่วน; ไม่มี; โค้งงอได้บางส่วน; อื่นๆ
cs: Kloubení končetin: Pevné; Plně kloubové; Žádné; Polopružné; Jiné
it: Articolazione degli arti: Fissi; Completamente articolati; Nessuno; Semiflessibili; Altro
bg-BG: Артикулация на раменете: Фиксирана; Напълно артикулирана; Няма; Полугъвкава; Друго
vi: Khớp chi: Cố định; Khớp nối linh hoạt; Không có; Bán linh hoạt; Khác
sv: Bågarmsled: Fast; Helt ledad; Ingen; Halvflexibel; Övrigt
nl: Ledemaat articulatie: Vast; Volledig gearticuleerd; Geen; Semi-flexibel; Overige
da: Lemmernes bevægelighed: Fast; Fuld bevægelighed; Ingen; Halvfleksibel; Andet
ko: 사지 관절: 고정형; 완전 관절형; 없음; 반유연형; 기타
pt-PT: Articulação dos membros: Fixo; Totalmente articulado; Nenhum; Semiflexível; Outro
hr-HR: Artikulacija udova: Fiksno; Potpuno zglobno; Ništa; Polufleksibilno; Ostalo
lt-LT: Galūnių lankstumas: Fiksuota; Visiškai lankstoma; Nėra; Pusiau lankstoma; Kita
sk-SK: Kĺbový ohyb ramien: Pevné; Plne kĺbové; Žiadne; Polopružné; Iné
de: Beweglichkeit der Gliedmaßen: Fest; Voll beweglich; Keine; Teilflexibel; Sonstige
zh-CN: 肢体活动关节: 固定; 全关节可动; 无; 半柔性; 其他
ja: 四肢の関節: 固定; フル可動; なし; セミフレキシブル; その他